Illinois, session 104th, HB272.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Whistleblower Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 174/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Whistleblower Act.9(Source: P.A. 93-544, eff. 1-1-04.)